Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-12] Stay of proceedings where
military service affects conduct thereof. In any action or proceeding in
any court in which a person in military service is involved, either as
plaintiff or defendant, during the period of that service or within sixty days
thereafter, the court in its discretion, on application to it by the person or
a person on such person's behalf, shall stay the action or proceeding at any
stage as provided in this chapter. No stay shall issue if, in the opinion of
the court, the ability of the plaintiff to prosecute the action or the
defendant to conduct the defense is not materially affected by reason of the
person's military service. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next